Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 3325.
Judicial control of discretionary power.

The court may not order a fiduciary to change a decision to exercise or not to exercise a discretionary power conferred by this chapter unless it determines that the decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion. A fiduciary’s decision is not an abuse of discretion merely because the court would have exercised the power in a different manner or would not have exercised the power.

The decisions to which subsection (a) of this section applies include:

a decision under subsection 3324(a) of this title as to whether and to what extent an amount should be transferred from principal to income or from income to principal; and

a decision regarding the factors that are relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries, the extent to which the factors are relevant, and the weight, if any, to be given to those factors, in deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the discretionary power conferred by subsection 3324(a) of this title.

If the court determines that a fiduciary has abused the fiduciary’s discretion, the court may place the income and remainder beneficiaries in the positions they would have occupied if the discretion had not been abused, according to the following rules:

To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in no distribution to a beneficiary or in a distribution that is too small, the court shall order the fiduciary to distribute from the trust to the beneficiary an amount that the court determines will restore the beneficiary, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary’s appropriate position.

To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in a distribution to a beneficiary which is too large, the court shall place the beneficiaries, the trust, or both, in whole or in part, in their appropriate positions by ordering the fiduciary to withhold an amount from one or more future distributions to the beneficiary who received the distribution that was too large or ordering that beneficiary to return some or all of the distribution to the trust.

To the extent that the court is unable, after applying subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, to place the beneficiaries or the trust or both in the positions they would have occupied if the discretion had not been abused, the court may order the fiduciary to pay an appropriate amount from its own funds to one or more of the beneficiaries or the trust or both.

Upon petition by the fiduciary, the court having jurisdiction over a trust or estate shall determine whether a proposed exercise or nonexercise by the fiduciary of a discretionary power conferred by this chapter will result in an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion. If the petition describes the proposed exercise or nonexercise of the power and contains sufficient information to inform the beneficiaries of the reasons for the proposal, the facts upon which the fiduciary relies, and an explanation of how the income and remainder beneficiaries will be affected by the proposed exercise or nonexercise of the power, a beneficiary who challenges the proposed exercise or nonexercise has the burden of establishing that it will result in an abuse of discretion.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

General.

All of the discretionary powers in the 1997 Act are subject to the normal rules that govern a fiduciary’s exercise of discretion.
Section 3325 codifies those rules for purposes of the Act so that they will be readily apparent and accessible to fiduciaries, beneficiaries, their counsel and the courts if and when questions concerning such powers arise.

Section 3325 also makes clear that the normal rules governing the exercise of a fiduciary’s powers apply to the discretionary power to adjust conferred upon a trustee by subsection 3324(a).
Discretionary provisions authorizing trustees to determine what is income and what is principal have been used in governing instruments for years; Section 2 of the 1931 Uniform Principal and Income Act recognized that practice by providing that “the person establishing the principal may himself direct the manner of ascertainment of income and principal . . . or grant discretion to the trustee or other person to do so . . . .”
Subdivision 3323(a)(2) also recognizes the power of a settlor to grant such discretion to the trustee.
Section 3325 applies to a discretionary power granted by the terms of a trust or a will as well as the power to adjust in subsection 3324(a).

Power to Adjust.

The exercise of the power to adjust is governed by a trustee’s duty of impartiality, which requires the trustee to strike an appropriate balance between the interests of the income and remainder beneficiaries. Subsection 3323(b) expresses this duty by requiring the trustee to “administer a trust or estate impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, except to the extent that the terms of the trust or the will clearly manifest an intention that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries.”
Because this involves the exercise of judgment in circumstances rarely capable of perfect resolution, trustees are not expected to achieve perfection; they are, however, required to make conscious decisions in good faith and with proper motives.

In seeking the proper balance between the interests of the beneficiaries in matters involving principal and income, a trustee’s traditional approach has been to determine the settlor’s objectives from the terms of the trust, gather the information needed to ascertain the financial circumstances of the beneficiaries, determine the extent to which the settlor’s objectives can be achieved with the resources available in the trust, and then allocate the trust’s assets between stocks and fixed-income securities in a way that will produce a particular level or range of income for the income beneficiary.
The key element in this process has been to determine the appropriate level or range of income for the income beneficiary, and that will continue to be the key element in deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the discretionary power conferred by subsection 3324(a).
If it becomes necessary for a court to determine whether an abuse of the discretionary power to adjust between principal and income has occurred, the criteria should be the same as those that courts have used in the past to determine whether a trustee has abused its discretion in allocating the trust’s assets between stocks and fixed-income securities.

A fiduciary has broad latitude in choosing the methods and criteria to use in deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust in order to achieve impartiality between income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries or the degree of partiality for one or the other that is provided for by the terms of the trust or the will.
For example, in deciding what the appropriate level or range of income should be for the income beneficiary and whether to exercise the power, a trustee may use the methods employed prior to the adoption of the 1997 Act in deciding how to allocate trust assets between stocks and fixed-income securities; or may consider the amount that would be distributed each year based on a percentage of the portfolio’s value at the beginning or end of an accounting period, or the average portfolio value for several accounting periods, in a manner similar to a unitrust, and may select a percentage that the trustee believes is appropriate for this purpose and use the same percentage or different percentages in subsequent years. The trustee may also use hypothetical portfolios of marketable securities to determine an appropriate level or range of income within which a distribution might fall.

An adjustment may be made prospectively at the beginning of an accounting period, based on a projected return or range of returns for a trust’s portfolio, or retrospectively after the fiduciary knows the total realized or unrealized return for the period; and instead of an annual adjustment, the trustee may distribute a fixed dollar amount for several years, in a manner similar to an annuity, and may change the fixed dollar amount periodically.
No inference of abuse is to be drawn if a fiduciary uses different methods or criteria for the same trust from time to time, or uses different methods or criteria for different trusts for the same accounting period.

While a trustee must consider the portfolio as a whole in deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust, a trustee may apply different criteria in considering the portion of the portfolio that is composed of marketable securities and the portion whose market value cannot be determined readily, and may take into account a beneficiary’s use or possession of a trust asset.

Under the prudent investor rule, a trustee is to incur costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets and the purposes of the trust, and the same consideration applies in determining whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust.
In making investment decisions under the prudent investor rule, the trustee will have considered the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust for the purpose of adopting an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the trust.
A trustee is not required to duplicate that work for principal and income purposes, and in many cases the decision about whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust may be made at the same time as the investment decisions.
To help achieve the objective of reasonable investment costs, a trustee may also adopt policies that apply to all trusts or to individual trusts or classes of trusts, based on their size or other criteria, stating whether and under what circumstances the power to adjust will be exercised and the method of making adjustments; no inference of abuse is to be drawn if a trustee adopts such policies.

General rule.

The first sentence of subsection 3325(a) is from Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 187 and Restatement (Third) of Trusts (Tentative Draft No. 2, 1999) § 50(1). The second sentence of subsection 3325(a) derives from comment
e
to § 187 of the Second Restatement and comment

b

to § 50 of the Third Restatement.

The reference in subsection 3325(a) to a fiduciary’s decision to exercise or not to exercise a discretionary power underscores a fundamental precept, which is that a fiduciary has a duty to make a conscious decision about exercising or not exercising a discretionary power. Comment
b
to § 50 of the Third Restatement states:

[A] court will intervene where the exercise of a power is left to the judgment of a trustee who improperly fails to exercise that judgment.
Thus, even where a trustee has discretion whether or not to make any payments to a particular beneficiary, the court will interpose if the trustee, arbitrarily or without knowledge of or inquiry into relevant circumstances, fails to exercise the discretion.

Subsection 3325(b) makes clear that the rule of subsection (a) applies not only to the power conferred by subsection 3324(a) but also to the evaluation process required by subsection 3324(b) in deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust.
Under subsection 3324(b), a trustee is to consider all of the factors that are relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries, including, to the extent the trustee determines they are relevant, the nine factors enumerated in subsection 3324(b).
Subsection 3324(b) derives from Section 2(c) of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, which lists eight circumstances that a trustee shall consider, to the extent they are relevant, in investing and managing assets.
The trustee’s decisions about what factors are relevant for purposes of subsection 3324(b) and the weight to be accorded each of the relevant factors are part of the discretionary decision-making process.
As such, these decisions are not subject to change for the purpose of changing the trustee’s ultimate decision unless the court determines that there has been an abuse of discretion in determining the relevancy and weight of these factors.

Remedy.

The exercise or nonexercise of a discretionary power under the Act normally affects the amount or timing of a distribution to the income or remainder beneficiaries.
The primary remedy under subsection 3325(c) for abuse of discretion is the restoration of the beneficiaries and the trust to the positions they would have occupied if the abuse had not occurred.
It draws on a basic principle of restitution that if a person pays money to someone who is not intended to receive it (and in a case to which this Act applies, not intended by the settlor to receive it in the absence of an abuse of discretion by the trustee), that person is entitled to restitution on the ground that the payee would be unjustly enriched if he were permitted to retain the payment.
See Restatement of Restitution § 22 (1937).
The objective is to accomplish the restoration initially by making adjustments between the beneficiaries and the trust to the extent possible; to the extent that restoration is not possible by such adjustments, a court may order the trustee to pay an amount to one or more of the beneficiaries, the trust, or both the beneficiaries and the trust.
If the court determines that it is not possible in the circumstances to restore them to their appropriate positions, the court may provide other remedies appropriate to the circumstances.
The approach of subsection 3325(c) is supported by comment
b
to § 50 of the Third Restatement of Trusts:

“When judicial intervention is required, a court may direct the trustee to make or refrain from making certain payments; issue instructions to clarify the standards or guidelines applicable to the exercise of the power; or rescind the trustee’s payment decisions, usually directing the trustee to recover amounts improperly distributed and holding the trustee liable for failure or inability to do so[.]”

Advance determinations.

Subsection 3325(d) employs the familiar remedy of the trustee’s petition to the court for instructions.
It requires the court to determine, upon a petition by the fiduciary, whether a proposed exercise or nonexercise of a discretionary power by the fiduciary of a power conferred by the Act would be an abuse of discretion under the general rule of subsection 3325(a).
If the petition contains the information prescribed in the second sentence of subsection (d), the proposed action or inaction is presumed not to result in an abuse, and a beneficiary who challenges the proposal must establish that it will.

Subsection (d) is intended to provide a fiduciary the opportunity to obtain an assurance of finality in a judicial proceeding before proceeding with a proposed exercise or nonexercise of a discretionary power.
Its purpose is not, however, to have the court instruct the fiduciary how to exercise the discretion.

A fiduciary may also obtain the consent of the beneficiaries to a proposed act or an omission to act, and a beneficiary cannot hold the fiduciary liable for that act or omission unless:

the beneficiary was under an incapacity at the time of such consent or of such act or omission; or

the beneficiary, when he gave his consent, did not know of his rights and of the material facts which the trustee knew or should have known and which the trustee did not reasonably believe that the beneficiary knew; or

the consent of the beneficiary was induced by improper conduct of the trustee.

Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 216.

If there are many beneficiaries, including some who are incapacitated or unascertained, the fiduciary may prefer the greater assurance of finality provided by a judicial proceeding that will bind all persons who have an interest in the trust.

§ 3326.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3327.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.